Utah statutes.
79-3-503.   Ownership of collections and resources.

(1)  Collections recovered from lands owned or controlled by the state or its subdivisions, except as provided in Subsection (2), shall be owned by the state.

(2)  Collections recovered from school and institutional trust lands shall be owned by the respective trust.

(3)  Paleontological resources, other than critical paleontological resources, recovered from school and institutional trust lands, shall be owned by the respective trust and shall be managed pursuant to statutory authority of the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration.

(4)  The repository or curation facility for collections from lands owned or controlled by the state or its subdivisions shall be designated pursuant to Section 53B-17-603.

(5)  Specimens found on lands owned or controlled by the state or its subdivisions may not be sold.

